California statutes. Vehicle Code
(a) The department, after notice and hearing, on an interim basis, may refuse to issue or may suspend a license issued under this chapter when the applicant or licensee, or a business representative if the applicant or licensee is a business, has been convicted of a crime involving moral turpitude which is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensed activity, if an appeal of the conviction is pending or the conviction has otherwise not become final. A conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is a conviction within the meaning of this section.

(b) If a conviction, on which an interim refusal to issue or suspension under subdivision (a) is based, is affirmed on appeal or otherwise becomes final, the refusal to issue or the suspension shall automatically take effect as a denial or revocation, as the case may be, of the license. If the interim refusal to issue or suspension was stayed under probationary terms and conditions, the subsequent automatic denial or revocation shall also be stayed under the same terms and conditions for a term not to exceed the original term of probation for the interim refusal to issue or suspension.

(c) If a conviction, upon which an interim refusal to issue or suspension under subdivision (a) is based, is reversed on appeal, the refusal or suspension shall be set aside immediately by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

11217.

(a) Every licensee under this chapter is entitled to notice and hearing prior to suspension or revocation of the license by the department, except that the department shall immediately suspend the license pursuant to subdivision (e) for any act of fraud specified in subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 11215.

(b) Before reinstatement of any license suspended pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11215, the licensee shall pay the department a reinstatement fee of five dollars ($5).

(c) The notice and hearings
 provided for in this division shall be pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) Any action of the department, in suspending, canceling, revoking, or failing to renew a license issued pursuant to this chapter, may be reviewed by any court of competent jurisdiction.

(e) The department may, pending a hearing, temporarily suspend the license or permit of any traffic violator school owner, operator, or instructor for a period of not more than 30 days if the director finds that the public interest so requires. In that case, a hearing shall be held and a decision issued within 30 days after issuance of the notice of temporary suspension.

(f) The suspension, expiration, or cancellation of a license issued pursuant to this chapter does not preclude
 the filing of an accusation for the revocation or suspension of the suspended, expired, or canceled license, and does not invalidate or otherwise preclude a decision by the department to suspend or revoke the license, and this determination may be considered by the department in granting or refusing to grant any subsequent license under this chapter to the same licensee or to any business representative of the same licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

11217.5.

Any owner licensed under this chapter who has closed his or her established place of business or any operator or instructor currently or previously licensed under this chapter who no longer resides at the address last filed with the department, may be served with process issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code by registered mail at that place of business, in the case of an owner, or at that residence, in the case of an operator or instructor, unless the person has notified the department in writing of another address where service may be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 751, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11218.

(a) After the filing of an accusation under this chapter, the director may enter into a stipulated compromise settlement agreement with the consent of the licensee on terms and conditions mutually agreeable to the director, the respondent licensee, and the accuser without further hearing or appeal. The agreement may include, but is not limited to, a period of probation or monetary penalties, or both. The monetary penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation for a traffic violator school owner or five hundred dollars
 ($500) per violation for traffic violator school operators or instructors, and shall be based on the nature of the violation and the effect of the violation on the purposes of this chapter.

(b) A compromise settlement agreement may be entered before, during, or after the hearing, but is valid only if executed and filed pursuant to subdivision (d) before the proposed decision of the hearing officer, if any, is adopted or the case is decided.

(c) The department shall adopt, by regulation, a schedule of maximum and minimum amounts of monetary penalties, the payment of which may be included as a term or condition of a compromise settlement agreement entered under subdivision (a). Any monetary penalty included in a compromise settlement agreement shall be within the range of monetary penalties in that schedule.

(d) Any
 compromise settlement agreement entered under this section shall be signed by the director, the respondent licensee, and the accuser, or by their authorized representatives. The director shall file, or cause to be filed, the agreement with the Office of Administrative Hearings, together with the department’s notice of withdrawal of the accusation or statement of issues upon which the action was initiated, unless that accusation or statement has not yet been forwarded to the Office of Administrative Hearings.

(e) If the respondent licensee fails to perform all of the terms and conditions of the compromise settlement agreement, the agreement is void and the department may take any action authorized by law notwithstanding the agreement, including, but not limited to, refiling the accusation or imposing license sanctions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 73.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

11219.

The director may prescribe rules and regulations for traffic violator schools regarding the conduct of courses of education including curriculum, facilities, and equipment. The curriculum shall include, but is not limited to, the rights and duties of a motorist as they pertain to pedestrians and the rights and duties of a pedestrian as they relate to traffic laws and traffic safety. The director may also prescribe rules and regulations for the conduct of instructor training courses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 833, second Sec. 5.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11219.3.

The curriculum prescribed pursuant to Section 11219 shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

 (a) The rights and duties of a motorist as they pertain to pedestrians.

 (b) The rights and duties of a pedestrian as they relate to traffic laws and traffic safety.

(c) Information that emphasizes respecting the right-of-way of others, particularly with respect to pedestrians, bicycle riders, and motorcycle riders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

11219.5.

(a) A traffic violator school shall issue a receipt for a fee collected by the traffic violator school from a person who registers for, attends, or completes a program of instruction in traffic safety at the licensed traffic violator school.

(b) In the event of a cancellation of a scheduled class, a licensee under this chapter shall not be required by the department to provide a program of instruction in traffic safety to a person for a fee that is less than the standard fee
 normally charged by the licensee for its program, if a notice of cancellation of a class is given to a student at least 72 hours prior to the start of the class, or if the class was canceled based upon exigent circumstances beyond the control of the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 396, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

11220.

The department may require any person licensed under this chapter to submit to a reexamination of his or her qualifications when there is reasonable cause to believe that the licensee does not have the ability to give instruction. If the licensee refuses or fails to submit to the reexamination, the department may, without a hearing, temporarily suspend his or her license until such time as the licensee submits to the reexamination. The suspension shall be effective upon receipt of notice by the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1037, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

11222.

The department may contract with a nongovernmental entity to administer any part of this chapter, subject to limitations in other laws regarding contracting out for services. No contract shall exceed three years’ duration. The contracting entity, and any affiliate or subsidiary thereof monitoring traffic violator schools, shall conform to all of the following requirements:

(a) Engage in no other business activity with traffic violator schools or any of the principals of the traffic violator schools,
 including the provision of services or supplies.

(b) Provide reports in statistical form to the department and to the Legislature as instructed by the department. These reports shall be issued not less frequently than annually.

(c) Make its records available for inspection by authorized representatives of the department, the Legislative Analyst, and the State Auditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 739, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11223.

A motorcyclist safety training program established pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 2930) of Chapter 5 of Division 2, that is licensed by the department as a traffic violator school, may administer a
 motorcyclist training course. In addition to the curriculum prescribed by the department pursuant to Section 11219, the motorcyclist training course may include instruction specific to the safe and lawful operation of motorcycles in accordance with Section 2932.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 561, Sec. 1.   (AB 1932)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Vehicle Verifiers [11300. - 11312.]

11300.

It shall be unlawful for any person to act as a vehicle verifier without first having procured a vehicle verifier’s permit issued by the department, or when such permit has been canceled, suspended, revoked or invalidated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 700.)
-------------------------------------------

11301.

Every vehicle verifier shall make application to the department upon the appropriate form, accompanied by a good and sufficient bond, approved as to form by the Attorney General, in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) with corporate surety thereon, duly licensed to do business within the State of California.

(a) The department shall prescribe and provide forms to be used for application for permits to be issued under the terms and provisions of this chapter and require of applicants information including, but not limited to, residence address, fingerprints, and personal history statements touching on and concerning the applicant’s character, honesty, integrity, and reputation as it may consider necessary.

(b) Upon receipt of an application in proper form accompanied by the appropriate fee, the department shall within 120 days, make a thorough investigation of the information contained in the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 751, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11301.5.

If a deposit is given instead of the bond required by Section 11301:

(a) The Director of Motor Vehicles may order the refund of the deposit three years from the date a vehicle verifier has ceased to be licensed, if the director is satisfied that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit. A judge of a superior court may order the return of the deposit prior to the expiration of three years from the date a vehicle verifier has ceased to be licensed if there is evidence satisfactory to the court that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit.

(b) If the director, department, or state is a defendant in any action instituted to recover all or any part of the deposit, or any action is instituted by the director, department, or state to determine those entitled to any part of the deposit, the director, department, or state shall be paid reasonable attorney fees and costs from the deposit. Costs shall include those administrative costs incurred in processing claims against the deposit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 599.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11302.

(a) The department may issue, or for reasonable cause shown, refuse to issue, a vehicle verifier’s permit to any applicant, or may, after notice and hearing, suspend or revoke the permit when satisfied that the applicant or permittee:

(1) Has violated any of the provisions of this division or has committed any acts which are grounds for the refusal to issue, or the suspension or revocation of a permit or license issued under this division.

(2) Was previously the holder of an occupational license issued by another state, authorizing the same or similar activities of a license issued under this division; and that license was revoked or suspended for cause and was never reissued, or was suspended for cause, and the terms of suspension have not been fulfilled.

(3) Has purchased, sold, or otherwise acquired or disposed of, a vehicle which was stolen or embezzled or has performed or submitted to the department, or its authorized representative, documents purporting verification of a vehicle which was stolen or embezzled.

(4) Has, in the course of performing a vehicle verification, acted with negligence or incompetence in the reporting of erroneous information to the department, or its authorized representative, and has thereby caused the department to issue inaccurate certificates of ownership or registration, or any other documents or indices which it would not otherwise have issued.

(b) Every hearing as provided for in this chapter shall be pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11302.2.

(a) Every person licensed under this chapter shall report to the department every change of residence address within 10 days of the change.

(b) Any person currently or previously licensed under this chapter who no longer resides at the address last filed with the department may be served with process issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code by registered mail at that residence, unless the person has notified the department in writing of another address where service may be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 751, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

11302.5.

(a) After the filing of an accusation under this chapter, the director may enter into a stipulated compromise settlement agreement with the consent of the licensee on terms and conditions mutually agreeable to the director, the respondent licensee, and the accuser without further hearing or appeal. The agreement may include, but is not limited to, a period of probation or monetary penalties, or both. The monetary penalty shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation, and it shall be based on the nature of the violation and the effect of the violation on the purposes of this chapter.

(b) A compromise settlement agreement may be entered before, during, or after the hearing, but is valid only if executed and filed pursuant to subdivision (d) before the proposed decision of the hearing officer, if any, is adopted or the case is decided.

(c) The department shall adopt, by regulation, a schedule of maximum and minimum amounts of monetary penalties, the payment of which may be included as a term or condition of a compromise settlement agreement entered under subdivision (a). Any monetary penalty included in a compromise settlement agreement shall be within the range of monetary penalties in that schedule.

(d) Any compromise settlement agreement entered under this section shall be signed by the director, the respondent licensee, and the accuser, or by their authorized representatives. The director shall file, or cause to be filed, the agreement with the Office of Administrative Hearings, together with the department’s notice of withdrawal of the accusation or statement of issues upon which the action was initiated.

(e) If the respondent licensee fails to perform all of the terms and conditions of the compromise settlement agreement, the agreement is void and the department may take any action authorized by law notwithstanding the agreement, including, but not limited to, refiling the accusation or imposing license sanctions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1022, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

11305.

It shall be unlawful and cause of disciplinary action for the holder of a vehicle verifier’s permit:

(a) To submit to the department, or its authorized representative, any document which purports to evidence the verification of any vehicle, without having actually physically inspected such vehicle to determine the existence of proper vehicle identification.

(b) To fail to report to the department, in a manner prescribed by the department, the absence, alteration, or obvious attempt to alter or obliterate any identifying number or number plate, or remove or attempt to remove such plate on any vehicle for which verification is performed.

(c) To fail to physically compare identifying numbers on a vehicle inspected to the information contained in any document of title, registration, or any other form describing such vehicle.

(d) To cause any person to suffer any loss or damage by reason of any fraud or deceit practiced upon such person in the course of the conducting of business under the vehicle verifier’s permit.

(e) To violate one or more terms and provisions of Section 20, or of Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000), or of this division of this code, or any rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, or of Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 700.)
-------------------------------------------

11306.

(a) If the department issues or renews a vehicle verifier’s permit requiring conditions of probation, or if the department refuses to issue a vehicle verifier’s permit, the applicant shall be entitled to demand, in writing, a hearing as provided in this chapter, before the director, or his representative, within 60 days after notice of refusal or issuance of the probationary permit.

(b) Except where the provisions of this code require the refusal to issue a permit, the department may issue a probationary permit subject to conditions to be observed by the permittee in the exercise of the privilege granted. The conditions to be attached to the exercise of the privilege shall be such as may, in the judgment of the department, be in the public interest and suitable to the qualifications of the applicant as disclosed by the application and investigation by the department of the information contained therein.

(c) The department may, pending a hearing, temporarily suspend the permit issued to a vehicle verifier for a period not to exceed 30 days if the director finds that such action is required in the public interest. In any such case, a hearing shall be held and a decision thereon issued within 30 days after notice of the temporary suspension.

(d) A person whose application for a permit has been denied may reapply for such permit after a period of not less than one year has elapsed from the date of filing of such denial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 700.)
-------------------------------------------

11307.

(a) A vehicle verifier shall maintain a record of each verification made. The record shall contain all of the following:

(1) The name and address of the person requesting the verification and the fee charged for such verification.

(2) The year model, vehicle identification number, license plate number of the vehicle verified and the state in which the vehicle was last registered.

(b) All records maintained by a vehicle verifier shall be open to inspection by any peace officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 700.)
-------------------------------------------

11308.

The department may adopt rules and regulations concerning the issuance, use, and renewal of a vehicle verifier’s permit, and for determining the competence of an applicant therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 700.)
-------------------------------------------

11309.

(a) The following fees for a vehicle verifier’s permit shall be paid to the department:

(1) For the application and original permit, except as provided by Section 42231, a nonrefundable fee of fifty dollars ($50).

(2) For an application for renewal, fifteen dollars ($15).

(b) All permits shall be renewed on a biennial basis. All original permits shall be issued for a period of not less than two years, except in the case of a probationary license which, in the discretion of the department, may be issued for a shorter term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1273, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

11310.

Any person who holds a vehicle verifier’s permit issued before the operative date of this chapter shall comply with the provisions of this chapter within three months after its operative date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 700.)
-------------------------------------------

11312.

The suspension, expiration, or cancellation of a vehicle verifier’s permit provided for in this chapter shall not prevent the filing of an accusation for the revocation or suspension of the suspended, expired, or canceled permit as provided in Section 11302 or 11305 or any rules or regulations adopted pursuant to Section 11308, and the department’s decision that the permit should be suspended or revoked. That determination may be considered in granting or refusing to grant any subsequent license or permit authorized by this division to that vehicle verifier or to a business representative of that prior vehicle verifier’s permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.5. Registration Services [11400. - 11413.]

11400.

No person shall act as a registration service, engage in the business of soliciting or receiving any application for the registration, renewal of registration, or transfer of registration or ownership of any vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code, or of soliciting or receiving an application for a motor carrier permit under Division 14.85 (commencing with Section 34600), or transmit or present any of those documents to the department, if any compensation is solicited or received for the service, without a license or temporary permit issued by the department pursuant to this chapter, or if that license or temporary permit has expired or been canceled, suspended, or revoked, or the terms and conditions of an agreement entered into pursuant to Section 11408 have not been fulfilled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 148, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

11401.

An applicant for a license to be a registration service shall submit an application to the department upon the appropriate form for a license and a distinguishing number. The applicant shall also include with the application any information as to the applicant’s character, honesty, integrity, and reputation which the department requires. The application shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) The type of ownership, whether an individual, a partnership, or a corporation. If the applicant is a partnership, the names and titles of all partners, except limited partners, shall be furnished. If the applicant is a corporation, the names and titles of all controlling stockholders, directors, and officers who, by reason of the facts and circumstances, could direct, control, or manage the business of the registration service shall be furnished.

(b) The name and address of the business, including street, city, and postal zip code of the principal place of business and any branch location.

(c) A personal history statement and fingerprints from any person required to be identified in subdivision (a), containing the information the department requires.

(d) The name, address, driver’s license number, and a brief physical description of all persons employed or otherwise engaged by the registration service to perform registration work.

(e) A bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, approved as to form by the Attorney General, to cover any loss to the public or the State of California arising out of the operation of the registration service.

(f) A nonrefundable application fee, as specified in Section 11409.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1196, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 1196.)
-------------------------------------------

11402.

(a) The amount of the bond required by subdivision (e) of Section 11401 for the issuance of a registration service license, or for the renewal of such a license is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). Liability under the bond shall remain at that amount.

(b) If the amount of the liability under the bond is decreased, or there is outstanding a final court judgment arising out of a violation of any provision of this code for which the registration service is liable, the license of the registration service shall be automatically suspended. In order to reinstate the license, the registration service shall either file an additional bond or restore the bond on file to the original amount, or shall satisfy the outstanding judgment for which the registration service and surety are liable.

(c) The bond shall remain in effect for three years after cessation of business of the registration service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 430, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11403.

(a) A license to conduct a registration service, or a renewal of that license, shall not be issued to any applicant unless the applicant files with the department an instrument, in writing, in which the applicant appoints the director as the agent of the applicant upon whom all process may be served in any action which may be commenced against the applicant arising out of any claim for damages by any person by reason of the violation by the applicant of any provision of this code in connection with the registration service or any condition of the registration service’s bond.

(b) The applicant shall agree in the instrument that any process directed to the applicant, when personal service of process upon the applicant cannot be made in this state after due diligence and, in that case, is served upon the director or, in the event of the director’s absence from the office, upon any employee in charge of the office of the director, is of the same force and effect as if served upon the applicant personally.

(c) The applicant shall further agree, in writing, that the agency created by the instrument shall continue during the period covered by any license that may be issued and so long thereafter as the applicant may be required to answer in damages for a violation of this code in connection with the registration service or any condition of the bond.

(d) The instrument appointing the director as the agent for the applicant for service of process shall be acknowledged by the applicant before a notary public.

(e) If the registration service is served with process by service upon the director, one copy of the summons and complaint shall be left with the director or in the director’s office in Sacramento or mailed to the office of the director in Sacramento. A fee of five dollars ($5) shall also be paid to the director at the time of service of the copy of the summons and complaint.

(f) Service on the director is a sufficient service on the registration service if a notice of service and a copy of the summons and complaint are immediately sent by registered mail by the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney to the registration service. A copy of the summons and complaint shall also be mailed by the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney to the surety on the registration service’s bond at the address of the surety given in the bond, postpaid and registered with request for return receipt.

(g) The director shall keep a record of all process served on the director pursuant to this section, which shall show the day and hour of service, and shall retain the summons and complaint so served on file.

(h) If the registration service is served with process by service upon the director, the registration service has 30 days from the date of that service within which to answer any complaint or other pleading which may be filed in the cause.

(i) For purposes of venue, if the registration service is served with process by service upon the director, the service is deemed to have been made upon the registration service in the county in which the registration service has, or last had, its principal place of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1196, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 1196.)
-------------------------------------------

11404.

(a) Until the department determines that the applicant meets all of the requirements of this chapter, it may issue a temporary permit to the person applying for a license as a registration service.

(b) The temporary permit shall permit the operation by the registration service or registration agent for not more than 120 days while the department is completing its investigation and determination of all facts relative to the qualifications of the applicant for the license. The department may cancel the temporary permit when it has determined that the application is incorrect or incomplete or that the temporary permit was issued in error.

(c) The temporary permit is invalid when canceled or when the license has been issued or refused.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1196, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 1196.)
-------------------------------------------

11405.

The department may refuse to issue a license to, or may suspend, revoke, or cancel the license of, a person to act as a registration service for any of the following reasons:

(a) The person has been convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude which is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensed activity.

(b) The person is, or has been, the holder, or a managerial employee of the holder, of any occupational license issued by the department which has been suspended or revoked.

(c) The applicant was previously the holder of an occupational license issued by another state, authorizing the same or similar activities of a license issued under this division; and that license was revoked or suspended for cause and was never reissued, or was suspended for cause, and the terms of suspension have not been fulfilled.

(d) The person has used a false or fictitious name, knowingly made any false statement, or knowingly concealed any material fact, in the application for the license.

(e) The person has knowingly made, or acted with negligence or incompetence, or knowingly or negligently accepted or failed to inquire about any false, erroneous, or incorrect statement or information submitted to the registration service or the department in the course of the licensed activity.

(f) The person has knowingly or negligently permitted fraud, or willfully engaged in fraudulent practices, with reference to clients, vehicle registrants, applicants for motor carrier permits under Division 14.85 (commencing with Section 34600), or members of the public, or the department in the course of the licensed activity.

(g) The person has knowingly or negligently committed or was responsible for any violation, cause for license refusal, or cause for discipline under Section 20 or Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000), Division 3.5 (commencing with Section 9840), Division 4 (commencing with Section 10500), or Division 5 (commencing with Section 11100), or Division 14.85 (commencing with Section 34600), or any rules or regulations adopted under those provisions.

(h) The person has failed to obtain and maintain an established place of business in California.

(i) The person has failed to keep the business records required by Section 11406.

(j) The person has violated any term or condition of a restricted license to act as a registration service.

(k) The person has committed or was responsible for any other act, occurrence, or event in California or any foreign jurisdiction which would be cause to refuse to issue a license to, or to suspend, revoke, or cancel the license of, a person to act as a registration service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 148, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

11406.

(a) Every registration service shall keep accurate business records containing all of the following information:

(1) The name, address, and license number of the registration service and the name and address of every employee who performs registration work.

(2) The name and address of each client for whom registration work was performed.

(3) The identity of every vehicle by year, make, type, license number, and vehicle identification number on which registration work was performed.

(4) The
 amount of registration fees or payments collected for each vehicle on which registration work was performed, including the method of payment to the registration service.

(5) The amount of registration fees or payments submitted to the department for each vehicle on which registration work was performed, including the date and method of payment to the department.

(6) The amount of any refunds or additional charges on registration fees or payments collected for each vehicle on which registration work was performed, including the date and method of payment of the refund or additional charge by or to the client, the registration service, or the department.

(7) The name, signature, or initials of each employee performing work on each transaction and the date the work was done.

(8) The cost to each client for the registration work performed on each of the client’s vehicles or to obtain a motor carrier permit.

(9) For each motor carrier for which motor carrier permit work was performed, the carrier identification number, business type, business address, carrier type, activities, and number of vehicles.

(10) For each motor carrier for which motor carrier permit work was performed, the amount of fees or payment collected and the method of payment.

(11) For each motor carrier for which motor carrier permit work was performed, the amount of fees or payment submitted to the department, including the date submitted and the method of payment to the department.

(b) As an
 alternative to maintaining the records required by paragraphs (1) to (11), inclusive, of subdivision (a), a registration service may retain a copy of the listing sheet approved by the department for transmitting registration or motor carrier permit documents to the department.

(c) Every registration service shall provide each customer with a document containing all of the information required by subdivision (a) relative to that customer’s transaction, excluding paragraph (7) and excluding the addresses of employees and other customers’ names and addresses. This requirement does not apply to transactions for customers of a dealer or dismantler.

(d) Every registration service shall display prominently at its place of business a sign indicating that the service is not a branch of the department and shall inform each customer of that fact.

(e) Every registration service shall provide a disclosure to each customer that the services described in Section 11400 may be provided by the department without an additional fee. If a registration service is providing a service described in Section 11400 in person, the disclosure required pursuant to this subdivision shall be in writing. If a registration service is providing a service described in Section 11400 on an Internet Web site, the disclosure required pursuant to this subdivision shall be in a conspicuous place on the Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   (AB 1627)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

11406.5.

Whenever a customer fails to submit to a registration service any documents, compensation, or fees requested in writing by the registration service, the registration service shall return all documents pertaining to the incomplete transaction, including the department receipt evidencing any fees paid, within 60 days after the request was sent to the customer, to the last known address of the customer, by registered mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 76.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

11407.

The business records required by Section 11406 shall be maintained for at least four years and shall be open to inspection by the department during normal business hours.

The department may duplicate or make a record of any information contained in any of those records, which shall be for the official use of the department.

All records shall be returned to the licensee not later than 30 days after receipt of the records by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1196, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 1196.)
-------------------------------------------

11408.

(a) The director may issue an order to grant an unrestricted or a restricted license to act as a registration service, or an order to deny, suspend, revoke, or cancel a license to act as a registration service.

(b) The order shall become final 30 days from issuance, unless the denied or restricted applicant or licensee files with the department a request for a hearing. Hearings shall be held pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) Any registration service may be served with an accusation issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code by registered mail to the address of the principal place of business on file with the department, whether or not the business has been closed or terminated, unless the registration service has notified the department in writing of another address where service shall be made.
